Hawaii statutes.
§514A-93.5
Disposition of unclaimed possessions. (a) When personalty in or on the common elements of a project has
been abandoned, the board of directors may sell the personalty in a
commercially reasonable manner, store such personalty at the expense of its
owner, donate such personalty to a charitable organization, or otherwise
dispose of such personalty in its sole discretion; provided that no such sale,
storage, or donation shall occur until sixty days after the board complies with
the following:

(1) The board notifies the owner in writing of:

(A) The identity and location of the
personalty; and

(B) The board of directors' intent to so
sell, store, donate, or dispose of the personalty.

Notification shall be by certified mail, return
receipt requested to the owner's address as shown by the records of the
association or to an address designated by the owner for the purpose of
notification or, if neither of these is available, to the owner's last known
address, if any; or

(2) If the
identity or address of the owner is unknown, the board of directors shall first
advertise the sale, donation, or disposition at least once in a daily paper of
general circulation within the circuit in which the personalty is located.

(b) The
proceeds of any sale [or] disposition of personalty under subsection (a) shall,
after deduction of any accrued costs of mailing, advertising, storage, and
sale, be held for the owner for thirty days. Any proceeds not claimed within
this period shall become the property of the association of apartment owners.
[L 2007, c 244, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next